West Virginia, session 2026, HB4287.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Examiners in Counseling. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 28, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-31-6 of this code, modified by the Board of Examiners in Counseling to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 21, 2025, relating to the Board of Examiners in Counseling (licensed professional counselor license renewal and continuing professional education requirements, 27 CSR 03), is authorized.